Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201290-519
State Department
of Education.

AGENCY NO. 13 — STATE DEPARTMENT
OF EDUCATION

Program No. 158 - Education Aid

FY2009-10
FY2010-11

GENERAL
FUND
1,034,668,501
1,004,011,278

CASH FUND
3,290,938
3,290,938

FEDERAL FUND est.
373,683,935
431,176,314

PROGRAM
TOTAL
1,411,643,374
1,438,478,530

There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2009-10 $1,034,668,501 General Funds, $3,290,938 Cash Funds, and $373,683,935
Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2010-11 $1,004,011,278 General Funds,
$3,290,938 Cash Funds, and $431,176,314 Federal Funds estimate for state aid,
which shall only be used for such purpose.

There is included in the amount shown for FY2009-10 $824,960,159
General Funds which are hereby appropriated to the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Fund, which fund is hereby appropriated to provide state aid
to public school districts pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities
Support Act. There is included in the amount shown for FY2010-11 $795,941,720 General Funds which are hereby
appropriated to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Fund, which fund
is hereby appropriated to provide state aid to public school districts pursuant
to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.

There is included in the amount shown for FY2009-10 $93,668,750
Federal Funds estimate pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment
Act of 2009 which are hereby appropriated to the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Fund, which fund is hereby appropriated to provide state aid
to public school districts pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities
Support Act. There is included in the amount shown for FY2010-11 $140,287,176
Federal Funds estimate pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment
Act of 2009 which are hereby appropriated to the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Fund, which fund is hereby appropriated to provide state aid
to public school districts pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities
Support Act.

There is included in the amount shown for this program $184,893,842
General Funds provided as state aid for FY2009-10 for special education reimbursement.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $184,893,842 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2010-11 for special education reimbursement.

There is included in the amount shown for this program $487,500
General Funds provided as state aid for FY2009-10 and $465,500 General Funds
provided as state aid for FY2010-11 to carry out the provisions of subsection
(2) of section 79-734.

There is included in the amount shown for this program $3,604,328
General Funds provided as state aid for FY2009-10 and $3,365,962 General Funds
provided as state aid for FY2010-11 for early childhood education projects.

There is included in the amount shown for this program $11,858,793
General Funds provided as state aid for FY2009-10 and $11,040,536 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2010-11 for core services for educational
service units.

There is included in the amount shown for this program $3,700,477
General Funds provided as state aid for FY2009-10 and $3,445,144 General Funds
provided as state aid for FY2010-11 for technology infrastructure for educational
service units.

There is included in the amount shown for this program $328,300
General Funds provided as state aid for FY2009-10 and $305,647 General Funds
provided as state aid for FY2010-11 for distance education aid to educational
service units.

There is included in the amount shown for this program $2,336,921
General Funds provided as state aid for FY2009-10 and $2,175,673 General Funds
provided as state aid for FY2010-11 for programs for learners with high ability.

There is included in the amount shown for this program $412,811
General Funds provided as state aid for FY2009-10 and $438,283 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2010-11 for the school breakfast program.

There is included in the amount shown for this program $410,560
General Funds provided as state aid for FY2009-10 and $392,032 General Funds
provided as state aid for FY2010-11 for the school lunch program.

There is included in the amount shown for this program $224,810
General Funds provided as state aid for FY2009-10 and $214,664 General Funds
provided as state aid for FY2010-11 for adult basic education programs.

There is included in the amount shown for this program $450,000
General Funds provided as state aid for FY2009-10 and $450,000 General Funds
provided as state aid for FY2010-11 for the Career Education Partnership Act.

There is included in the amount shown for this program $1,000,000
General Funds provided as state aid for FY2009-10 and $882,275 General Funds
provided as state aid for FY2010-11 for learning community aid.

On or before October 1 of each year, the Department of Health
and Human Services and the State Department of Education shall jointly certify
to the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services the amount of federal medicaid funds paid to school districts pursuant
to the Early Intervention Act for special education services for children
age five years and older. The General Fund appropriation to the State Department
of Education, Program 158, for state special education aid shall be decreased
by an amount equal to the amount that would have been reimbursed with state
General Funds to the school districts through the special education reimbursement
process for special education services for children age five years and older
that was paid to school districts or approved cooperatives with federal medicaid
funds. There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund an amount equal
to the amount certified to the budget administrator for FY2009-10 and FY2010-11
to the Department of Health and Human Services to aid in carrying out the
provisions of Laws 1991, LB 701. The budget administrator shall distribute
the amount appropriated between budget programs according to percentages certified
by the Department of Health and Human Services.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this act, all appropriations
within this program existing on June 30, 2009, in excess of expended or encumbered
amounts are hereby lapsed.

The unexpended
General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2010, less $47,596,
is hereby reappropriated.

Laws 2010, LB935, § 128;

Laws 2010, LB937A, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB373, § 33.

Early Intervention Act, see section 43-2501.

Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act, see section 79-1001.